District of Columbia statutes.
7-706.01

Rules.

Within 90 days of March 16, 1989, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 601, 36 DCR 534
1981 Ed., § 6-3551.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 7-218, the “District of Columbia Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-86, April 28, 1989.